Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-593
Terms, defined.

For
purposes of sections 86-593 to 86-598:

(1) Broadband services means the offering of a capability for high-speed
broadband telecommunications capability at a speed or bandwidth in excess
of two hundred kilobits per second that enables users to originate and receive
high-quality voice, data, and video telecommunications using any technology;

(2) Internet services means the offering of Internet service provider
services, providing voice over Internet protocol services, or providing Internet
protocol-based video services;

(3) Public power supplier means a public power district, a public power
and irrigation district, a municipal electric system, a joint entity formed
under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, a joint public agency formed under the
Joint Public Agency Act, an agency formed under the Municipal Cooperative
Financing Act, or any other governmental entity providing electric service;

(4) Telecommunications has the same meaning as telecommunications defined
in section 86-117;

(5) Telecommunications services has the same meaning as telecommunications
service defined in section 86-121; and

(6) Video services means the delivery of any subscription video service
except those described in section 70-625.

Laws 2005, LB 645, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 22.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.

Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, see section 18-2401.